Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4205
Recommendation regarding guardianship, conservatorship, or protective order; written report; contents.

(1) The guardian ad litem shall make recommendations to the court regarding a temporary or permanent guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective order. The report shall be in writing and provided to the court at least one week prior to the hearing date. A copy of the report shall be provided to all interested persons.

(2) For a guardianship proceeding, the report shall address whether the person for whom the guardianship is sought is an incapacitated person. If the guardian ad litem determines that the person is incapacitated, the guardian ad litem shall make recommendations as to whether the court should order a limited or full guardianship. If the guardian ad litem recommends a limited guardianship, the report shall include recommendations on the authorities and responsibilities the guardian and ward shall have. If a full guardianship is recommended, the report shall specifically address why a full guardianship is necessary to protect the best interests of the incapacitated person.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 18.